Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-613.02
Violation; penalty; false information; enforcement.

Any person violating any provision of sections 46-601 to 46-613.01 or furnishing false information under such sections shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day of a violation may be considered a separate offense. The Attorney General and the county attorneys may pursue appropriate proceedings pursuant to this section when notified by the Chief Water Officer that such a violation has occurred.

Laws 1978, LB 688, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 1060, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 175;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 176.